Virginia statutes. Title 53.1. Prisons and Other Methods of Correction.
Article 6. Duties of Sheriffs.

§ 53.1-116.
What records and policy jailer shall keep; how time deducted or added for felons and misdemeanants; payment of fine and costs by person committed to jail until he pays.

The jailer shall keep a (i) record describing each person committed to jail, the terms of confinement, for what offense or cause he was committed, and when received into jail; (ii) record of each prisoner; and (iii) written policy stating the criteria for and conditions of earned credit in the facility and the revocation of such credit.Unless he is serving a mandatory minimum sentence of confinement, each prisoner sentenced to 12 months or less for a misdemeanor or any combination of misdemeanors shall earn good conduct credit at the rate of one day for each one day served, including all days served while confined in jail prior to conviction and sentencing, in which the prisoner has not violated the written rules and regulations of the jail.Prisoners eligible for parole under §

53.1-151

,

53.1-152

or

53.1-153

shall earn good conduct credit at a rate of 15 days for each 30 days served with satisfactory conduct.The jailer may grant the prisoner additional credits for performance of institutional work assignments, participation in classes, or participation in local work force programs, if available at the facility, at the rate of five days for every 30 days served. The time so deducted shall be allowed to each prisoner for such time as he is confined in jail. It shall be the responsibility of the jailer in each facility to determine the manner in which these additional credits may be awarded and to include this information in the written policy mandated by clause (iii) of this subsection.For each violation of the rules prescribed herein, the time so deducted shall be added until it equals the full sentence imposed upon the prisoner by the court.However, any prisoner committed to jail upon a felony offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, shall not earn good conduct credit, sentence credit, earned sentence credit, other credit, or a combination of any credits in excess of that permissible under Article 4 (§

53.1-202.2

et seq.) of Chapter 6 of this title. So much of an order of any court contrary to the provisions of this section shall be deemed null and void.

Notwithstanding the provisions of §

19.2-350

, in the event a person who was committed to jail to be therein confined until he pays a fine imposed on him by the court in which he was tried should desire to pay such fine and costs, he may pay the same to the person in charge of the jail. The person receiving such moneys shall execute and deliver an official receipt therefor and shall promptly transmit the amount so paid to the clerk of the court which imposed the fine and costs. Such clerk shall give him an official receipt therefor and shall properly record the receipt of such moneys.

The administrator of a local or regional jail shall not assign a person to a home/electronic incarceration program pursuant to subsection C of §

53.1-131.2

in a locality which has a jail operated by a sheriff, without the consent of the sheriff.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-151; 1952, c. 218; 1972, c. 293; 1981, c. 278; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 561; 1984, c. 643; 1990, c. 934; 1994, 2nd Sp. Sess., cc. 1, 2; 1996, c. 556; 1998, c. 776; 1999, cc. 951, 1007; 2003, cc. 818, 820; 2004, cc. 400, 461; 2011, c. 491.

Cross references.

As to earned sentence credits during furloughs, see §§

53.1-37

and

53.1-132

.

The 1998 amendment

added subsection C.

The 1999 amendments.

The 1999 amendments by cc. 951 and 1007 are identical, and in subsection A, deleted “however, any prisoner committed to jail upon a felony offense committed on or after January 1, 1995, shall not earn any good conduct credit except as hereinafter provided” following “imposed by law” in the third sentence, and added the present next-to-last sentence.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 818 and 820 are identical, and in subsection A, divided the former single paragraph into four paragraphs; combined the former first two sentences of the first paragraph into one sentence and in that sentence inserted the clause (i) designation, substituted “(ii)” for “The jailer shall keep a,” added “and” at the end of clause (ii), and added clause (iii); substituted “prisoner sentenced to 12 months or less for a misdemeanor or any combination of misdemeanors shall” for “prisoner not eligible for parole under §§

53.1-151

,

53.1-152

or §

53.1-153

shall” and substituted “15” for “fifteen” and “30” for “thirty” in the present second paragraph; and deleted “established under §

53.1-128

” following “work force program” and substituted “30” for “thirty” in the first sentence of the third paragraph.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 400, in subsection A, in the third paragraph, substituted “credits” for “credit,” inserted “participation in classes,” and substituted “local work force programs, if available at the facility” for “a local work force program” in the first sentence and added the last sentence.

The 2004 amendment by c. 461, in subsection A, in the first sentence of the second paragraph, added “Unless he is serving a mandatory minimum sentence of confinement” at the beginning and deleted “unless a mandatory minimum sentence is imposed by law” at the end.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 491 in subsection A, added “and the revocation of such credit” in the first paragraph, and made minor stylistic changes in the third paragraph.

Law Review.

For survey of the law in the Fourth Circuit on habeas corpus and prisoner’s rights, see 34 Wash. & Lee L. Rev. 625 (1977).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, §§ 83, 92.

§ 53.1-116.1.
Jailer to give notice of release of certain prisoners.

Prior to the release or discharge of any prisoner for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, the sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall give notice to the prisoner of his duty to register with the State Police. A person required to register shall register, submit to be photographed as part of the registration, and provide information regarding place of employment, if available, to the sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator. The sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall also obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police; inform the person of his duties regarding reregistration and change of address; and inform the person of his duty to register. The sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall forthwith forward the registration information to the Department of State Police on the date of the prisoner’s release.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall promptly investigate or request the State Police to promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was discharged. The sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

The sheriff, jail superintendent, or other jail administrator shall notify the State Police immediately upon discovering the escape of any prisoner for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1.

History.

1994, c. 362; 1997, c. 747; 2003, c. 584; 2006, cc. 857, 914; 2010, c. 858.

Cross references.

For regulations governing the operation and maintenance of the sex offender and crimes against minors registry, see 19 VAC 30-170-15 et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1997, c. 747, cl. 2, provided: “That, prior to July 1, 1997, or as soon thereafter as is reasonably practicable, the Department of State Police shall promulgate regulations consistent with and necessary for implementation of the requirements of this act and 42 U.S.C. § 14071.”

The 1997 amendment

substituted “an offense for which registration is required as defined in §

19.2-298.1

” for “a felony in violation of §§

18.2-61

,

18.2-63

,

18.2-64.1

,

18.2-67.1

,

18.2-67.2

,

18.2-67.3

,

18.2-67.5

,

18.2-370

or §

18.2-370.1

or, where the victim is a minor or is physically helpless or mentally incapacitated as defined in §

18.2-67.10

, subsection B of §

18.2-361

and subsection B of §

18.2-366

” in the first sentence and added the last two sentences.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 584, in the first sentence, substituted “sentence for an offense for which registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1” for “sentence upon a conviction of an offense for which registration is required as defined in §

19.2-298.1

,” and deleted “in accordance with §

19.2-298.1

” at the end of that sentence, and deleted “under this section” at the end of the next-to-last sentence.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914 are identical, and inserted the A designation at the beginning of the first paragraph and in subsection A substituted “for whom” for “serving a sentence for an offense for which” in the first sentence, added the second sentence, and substituted “on the date of the prisoner’s release” for “within seven days of receipt” at the end of the last sentence; and added subsection B.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 858 added subsection C.

§ 53.1-116.1:01.
Jailer to give notice of intake of certain prisoners.

At the time of intake of any prisoner, for whom registration with the Sex Offender and Crimes Against Minors Registry is required pursuant to Chapter 9 (§

9.1-900

et seq.) of Title 9.1, the sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall also obtain from that person all necessary registration information, including fingerprints and photographs of a type and kind approved by the Department of State Police. A person required to register shall register, and submit to be photographed as part of the registration. The sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall forthwith forward the registration information to the Department of State Police on the date of the prisoner’s intake.

Whenever a person required to register has failed to comply with the provisions of subsection A, the sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall promptly investigate or request the State Police promptly investigate and, if there is probable cause to believe a violation has occurred, obtain a warrant or assist in obtaining an indictment charging a violation of §

18.2-472.1

in the jurisdiction in which the person was discharged. The sheriff, jail superintendent or other jail administrator shall notify the State Police forthwith of such actions taken pursuant to this section.

History.

2006, cc. 857, 914.

§ 53.1-116.1:02.
Jailer-issued identification.

Prior to the release or discharge of any prisoner who has been confined for at least 90 days and does not possess a government-issued identification card, birth certificate, and Social Security card, the sheriff, jail superintendent, or other jail administrator shall provide the assistance necessary for such prisoner to apply for and obtain such identification and documents prior to his release or discharge, provided that the sheriff, superintendent, or administrator has or can readily obtain all records and information necessary for their issuance and the prisoner has not declined an offer by the sheriff, superintendent, or administrator to provide such assistance. If the sheriff, jail superintendent, or other jail administrator receives a government-issued identification card, birth certificate, or Social Security card for a prisoner after his release or discharge, the sheriff, superintendent, or administrator shall make reasonable efforts to ensure that the prisoner obtains possession of such identification or document. The sheriff, jail superintendent, or other jail administrator may establish a procedure for securing such identification through the Department of Motor Vehicles. Unless the prisoner has funds in his account to cover all or part of the costs and fees associated with applying for and obtaining any identification or documents pursuant to this section, such costs shall be paid by the jail.

History.

2010, c. 856; 2020, cc. 484, 523.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 484 and 523 are identical, and rewrote the section, which read, “Prior to the release or discharge of any prisoner, if the prisoner does not already possess a government-issued identification card, the sheriff, jail superintendent, or other jail administrator may issue that prisoner a special identification card to be given to the prisoner upon his release. The sheriff, jail superintendent, or other jail administrator may establish a procedure for securing such identification through the Department of Motor Vehicles. All costs and fees associated with obtaining such special identification card shall be paid by the prisoner.”

§ 53.1-116.2.
Sheriffs to be keepers of jails.

The sheriff of each county or city shall be the keeper of the jail thereof unless that locality is a member of a jail or jail farm board or regional jail authority, in which case the provisions of §

53.1-106

shall apply.

History.

1994, c. 491.

The number of this section

was assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the number in the 1994 act having been

53.1-116.1

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1994, c. 491, cl. 2 provides that the provisions of this act are declaratory of existing law.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Security at public facility operated by community services board. —

A sheriff may assign a deputy to provide full-time security at a public facility operated by a community services board, such as a program for students that is operated by a community services board in cooperation with a local public school system. See opinion of Attorney General to Lucy E. Phillips, Esquire, Washington County Attorney, 17-012, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 25 (11/16/17).

§ 53.1-116.3.
Improper release; capias, arrest and hearing.

The sheriff or jail superintendent or his designee, upon the discovery of an improper release or discharge of a prisoner from custody, shall report such release or discharge to the sentencing court. The court shall then for good cause shown issue a capias for the arrest of the prisoner which may be executed by any duly sworn jail officer or law-enforcement officer. Such capias shall direct that the prisoner be presented forthwith to the court to determine the propriety of the original discharge or release. After a hearing, if the court is satisfied that the original release or discharge was made improperly, the prisoner shall be returned to the jail facility from which he was released or discharged.

History.

1997, c. 127.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

14B M.J. Prisons and Prisoners, § 5.

§ 53.1-117.
Violations of rules to be recorded in register.

Every time any prisoner in jail is guilty of a violation of the rules so prescribed, the name of the prisoner, the rules which he has violated and the time when each violation occurred shall be recorded in a register provided for that purpose.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-152; 1982, c. 636.

§ 53.1-118.
Courts to fine sheriffs for failure to perform duties.

If it appears to the circuit court having jurisdiction that the sheriff or jail superintendent has in any respect failed to perform his duties with respect to the operation of the jail, the court may, after summoning him to show cause against it, summarily fine him not more than fifty dollars.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-161; 1970, c. 648; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-119.
Court duties of sheriff.

The sheriff shall provide officers to attend the courts within his jurisdiction while such courts are in session as the respective judges may require. The sheriff, or the superintendent of a regional jail or jail farm, shall receive into the jail facility all persons committed by the order of such courts, or under process issuing therefrom, and all persons committed by any other lawful authority.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-162; 1982, c. 636; 1995, c. 112.

§ 53.1-120.
Sheriff to provide for courthouse and courtroom security; designation of deputies for such purpose; assessment.

Each sheriff shall ensure that the courthouses and courtrooms within his jurisdiction are secure from violence and disruption and shall designate deputies for this purpose. A list of such designations shall be forwarded to the Director of the Department of Criminal Justice Services.

The chief circuit court judge, the chief general district court judge and the chief juvenile and domestic relations district court judge shall be responsible by agreement with the sheriff of the jurisdiction for the designation of courtroom security deputies for their respective courts. If the respective chief judges and sheriff are unable to agree on the number, type and working schedules of courtroom security deputies for the court, the matter shall be referred to the Compensation Board for resolution in accordance with existing budgeted funds and personnel.

The sheriff shall have the sole responsibility for the identity of the deputies designated for courtroom security.

Any county or city, through its governing body, may assess a sum not in excess of $20 as part of the costs in each criminal or traffic case in its district or circuit court in which the defendant is convicted of a violation of any statute or ordinance. If a town provides court facilities for a county, the governing body of the county shall return to the town a portion of the assessments collected based on the number of criminal and traffic cases originating and heard in the town. The imposition of such assessment shall be by ordinance of the governing body that may provide for different sums in the circuit courts and district courts. The assessment shall be collected by the clerk of the court in which the case is heard, remitted to the treasurer of the appropriate county or city and held by such treasurer to be appropriated by the governing body to the sheriff’s office. The assessment shall be used solely for the funding of courthouse security personnel, and, if requested by the sheriff, equipment and other personal property used in connection with courthouse security.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-168.1; 1972, c. 135; 1982, c. 636; 1986, c. 568; 1988, c. 119; 1989, c. 571; 2002, cc. 533, 756; 2003, cc. 26, 44; 2004, cc. 390, 432; 2006, c. 495; 2007, c. 377; 2020, c. 602.

Cross references.

As to establishment of training standards for courtroom security by the Department of Criminal Justice Services, see §

9.1-102

.

As to compliance with minimum training standards, see §

9.1-113

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1992, c. 893, Item 69 D, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 965, Item 69 D, and Acts 1994, c. 966, Item 82 D, provides that notwithstanding the provisions of this section, or any other section of the Code of Virginia, unless a judge provides the sheriff with a written order stating that a substantial security risk exists in a particular case, no courtroom security deputies may be ordered for civil cases, not more than one deputy may be ordered for criminal cases in a district court, and not more than two deputies may be ordered for criminal cases in a circuit court. In complying with such orders for additional security, the sheriff may consider other deputies present in the courtroom as part of his security force.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

Acts 2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 68 C, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “Notwithstanding the provisions of §

53.1-120

, or any other section of the Code of Virginia, unless a judge provides the sheriff with a written order stating that a substantial security risk exists in a particular case, no courtroom security deputies may be ordered for civil cases, not more than one deputy may be ordered for criminal cases in a district court, and not more than two deputies may be ordered for criminal cases in a circuit court. In complying with such orders for additional security, the sheriff may consider other deputies present in the courtroom as part of his security force.”

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 533 and 756 added “assessment” at the end of the section catchline; and in the first sentence in subsection A, deleted “designate deputies who shall” following “Each sheriff shall” and added “and shall designate deputies for this purpose” at the end. Chapter 756 also added subsection D.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendments by cc. 26 and 44 are identical, and in subsection D, substituted “$5” for “five dollars” in the first sentence, and deleted the former last sentence, which read: “The provisions of this subsection shall expire on July 1, 2004.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 390 and 432 are identical, and added the language beginning “and, if requested by the sheriff” at the end of the last sentence in subsection D.

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendment by c. 495, in subsection D, divided the former last sentence into two sentences by substituting “to be appropriated” for “subject to appropriation” in the fourth sentence and inserting “The assessment shall be used solely” at the beginning of the fifth sentence.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 377 substituted “$10” for “$5” in the first sentence of subsection D.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 602 substituted “$20” for “$10” in subsection D in the first sentence.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

19 M.J. Trial, § 3.

§ 53.1-121.
Sheriffs to make daily reports to Compensation Board; failure to send report.

The sheriff shall report each day to the Compensation Board, giving the record of each prisoner received during the preceding day in an electronic format approved by the Compensation Board, stating whether the offense is for violation of state law or of city or town ordinance.

If any sheriff fails to send such report, the Compensation Board shall notify the sheriff of such failure. If the sheriff fails to make the report within ten days, then the Compensation Board shall cause the report to be prepared from the books of the sheriff and shall certify the cost thereof to the Comptroller. The Comptroller shall issue his warrant on the Treasurer for that amount, deducting the same from any funds that may be due the sheriff by the Commonwealth.

The computer-generated report shall be authenticated by both the chief jailer and the sheriff who shall certify the accuracy of the report. Either authenticator found guilty of willfully falsifying the information contained in such report shall be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-169; 1972, c. 573; 1982, c. 636; 1983, c. 358; 1996, c. 288; 1998, cc. 204, 350; 2006, cc. 857, 914.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1998 amendments.

The 1998 amendments by cc. 204 and 350 are identical, and in the second paragraph, in the first sentence, substituted “ten business days” for “five days.”

The 2006 amendments.

The 2006 amendments by cc. 857 and 914, effective October 1, 2006, are identical, and in the first paragraph, substituted “each” for “on the first,” deleted “of each month” after “day,” and substituted “day in an electronic format approved” for “month on blank forms to be furnished” in the first sentence; in the second paragraph deleted “within ten business days after the date when the report should be forwarded” after “such report” in the first sentence, and deleted “from that date” after “ten days” in the second sentence; and in the third paragraph added “computer-generated” and substituted “authenticated” for “signed” in the first sentence, and substituted “authenticator” for “signer” in the second sentence.

§ 53.1-122.
Daily records of sheriffs and jail superintendents.

Each sheriff and jail superintendent shall keep a daily record showing the total number of prisoners confined in the jail of his county or city, the number of prisoners admitted, the number released and the time of each such admittance and release. Such records shall show such information separately as to the prisoners of the Commonwealth, of each county, city or town, of the United States, and of any other state or country.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-170; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-123.
Other accounts, information and records as required by Department.

Sheriffs and jail superintendents shall keep such other accounts and records and furnish to the Department such information and reports as may be required by the Department.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-171; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-124.
Sheriffs and jail superintendents to report to the courts.

If requested by the judge, the sheriffs of all local jails and the jail superintendents of all regional jails of this Commonwealth shall, on the first day of each term of the circuit court, make written reports to the judge thereof, to the attorney for the Commonwealth, and to city attorneys whose duties include prosecuting certain cases, showing the number of prisoners in jail on that day. The report shall show the name, date of commitment, offense and sentence of each prisoner. The judge of such court, after examining the report, shall enter an order directing the clerk to file the same in the clerk’s office of such court.

If requested by the chief judge of the circuit court, general district court or juvenile and domestic relations district court, the sheriffs of all local jails and the jail superintendents of all regional jails of the Commonwealth shall report semimonthly to the circuit court, general district court, and juvenile and domestic relations district court, to the attorney for the Commonwealth, and to the public defender, if any, as established in Article 3.1 (§

19.2-163.01

et seq.) of Chapter 10 of Title 19.2, showing the number of prisoners in jail on that day awaiting trial. The report shall include the name, offense, date of commitment to jail, and amount of bail established.

If requested by the judge, the sheriffs of all local jails and the jail superintendents of all regional jails shall report weekly to the juvenile and domestic relations district court located within that county, city or region concerning the identity and number of juveniles kept in their jails and the length of time such juveniles have been incarcerated therein.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-172; 1976, c. 248; 1982, c. 636; 1990, c. 934; 1991, cc. 218, 383; 2004, cc. 884, 921.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 3, as amended by Acts 1994, c. 564, cl. 2, and Acts 1996, c. 616, cl. 4, provides that the amendment to this section by Acts 1993, c. 930, cl. 1, shall become effective June 1, 1998, “if state funds are provided, including all local costs, to carry out the purposes of this bill by the General Assembly.” The funding was not provided.

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendments by cc. 884 and 921 are identical, and substituted “Article 3.1 (§

19.2-163.01

et seq.)” for “Article 4 (§

19.2-163.1

et seq.)” in subsection B.

§ 53.1-125.
Failure of sheriffs or jail superintendents to comply with requirements of board; filing of complaint; withholding salary.

If any sheriff or jail superintendent through his default or neglect fails to comply with the requirements of the Board in the operation and management of any jail under his control or management, the Board shall file a complaint with the circuit court of the county or city in which such jail is located, giving ten days’ notice to the sheriff or jail superintendent that on a date fixed in the notice the court will conduct a hearing on the complaint. If the court is of the opinion that the complaint is justified, it shall enter an order directing the State Compensation Board to withhold approval of the payment of any further salary to the sheriff or jail superintendent until there has been compliance with specified requirements of the Board. If the court is of the opinion that the charges are unfounded, the complaint shall be dismissed.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-173; 1974, cc. 44, 45; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383.

§ 53.1-126.
Responsibility of sheriffs and jail superintendents for food, clothing and medicine.

The sheriff or jail superintendent shall purchase at prices as low as reasonably possible all foodstuffs and other provisions used in the feeding of jail prisoners and such clothing and medicine as may be necessary. Nothing herein shall be construed to require a sheriff, jail superintendent or a locality to pay for the medical treatment of an inmate for any injury, illness, or condition that existed prior to the inmate’s commitment to a local or regional facility, except that medical treatment shall not be withheld for any communicable diseases, serious medical needs, or life threatening conditions. Invoices or itemized statements of account from each vendor of such foodstuffs, provisions, clothing and medicines shall be obtained by the sheriff or jail superintendent and presented for payment to the governing body of the city or county or, in the case of regional jails, the regional jail authority or, if none, that body responsible for the fiscal management of the regional jails, which shall be responsible for the payment thereof. He shall certify on each statement or invoice that the merchandise has been received and that the vendor has complied with the terms of the purchase. Such certification shall be in the following words: “I hereby certify that the merchandise or service has been received and that the terms of the purchase have been complied with on the part of the vendor. The merchandise or service has been or will be used solely for the feeding and care of prisoners confined in jail.” If any county or city has a purchasing agent, the local governing body may require all such purchases to be made by or through the purchasing agent.

History.

Code 1950, § 53-175; 1982, c. 636; 1991, c. 383; 2003, cc. 928, 1019; 2011, c. 727.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by cc. 928 and 1019 are virtually identical and inserted the second sentence. The sentence as added by c. 1019 includes the phrase “serious medical needs.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendment by c. 727, in the third sentence, inserted “for payment” preceding “to the governing body of the city” and added “which shall be responsible for the payment thereof” to the end.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Payment for medical treatment of inmate. —

There is no requirement that sheriff, jail superintendent, or locality pay for inmate’s medical treatment for condition preexisting incarceration, except when condition is communicable disease, serious medical need, or life threatening; sheriff must transport inmate to medical facility and pay for treatment when it is not available at jail. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert T. Williamson, Sheriff for Frederick County, 04-013 (4/16/04) (overruled to the extent that it is inconsistent with 2017 opinion numbered 16-055).

Local correctional facilities must ensure inmates receive appropriate medical care for communicable diseases, serious medical needs, or life threatening conditions, whether pre-existing or not, those facilities are not liable for the cost of such treatment by outside healthcare providers if such disease, medical need or condition existed prior to local incarceration. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable David R. Hines, Hanover County Sheriff, 16-055, 2017 Va. AG LEXIS 14 (4/27/17).

Food harvested and consumed by prisoners. —

Assuming all other statutory provisions are met, inmate crews may cultivate a garden on private property leased to a nonprofit organization so long as the nonprofit organization qualifies as exempt from taxation under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3). See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Kenneth W. Stolle, Sheriff/High Constable for Virginia Beach, 11-109, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 47 (12/16/11).

Local funding of sheriffs’ offices. —

Statute requires the locality to directly pay vendors of foodstuffs and other provisions purchased by the sheriff and used by jail prisoners. No statute authorizes revenues dedicated for prisoner processing or courthouse security to be used to “credit” or offset funds a locality is required to pay a sheriff for other purposes. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Ken Stolle, Sheriff, City of Virginia Beach, No. 15-010, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 22 (7/24/15).

Medical costs. —

Compensation Board is required to reimburse local correctional facilities for the medical costs of all inmates who are “State Responsible” while those inmates are in the temporary custody of a local correctional facility, beginning on the sixty-first day after notice of the commitment order is provided. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable C.T. Woody, Jr., Sheriff, City of Richmond, 15-079, 2016 Va. AG LEXIS 16 (9/1/16).

§ 53.1-127.
Who may enter interior of local correctional facilities; searches of those entering.

Members of the local governing bodies that participate in the funding of a local correctional facility may go into the interior of that facility. The Governor, members of the General Assembly, and agents of the Board may go into the interior of any local correctional facility. In addition, Department of Corrections staff and state and local health department staff shall, in the performance of their duties, have access to the interior of any local correctional facility subject to the standards promulgated pursuant to subsections A and B of §

53.1-68

. Attorneys shall be permitted in the interior of a local correctional facility to confer with prisoners who are their clients and with prisoners who are witnesses in cases in which they are involved. Except for the announced or unannounced inspections authorized pursuant to subsections A and B of §

53.1-68

or a review conducted pursuant to §

53.1-69.1

, the sheriff, jail administrator, or other person in charge of the facility shall prescribe the time and conditions under which attorneys and other persons may enter the local correctional facility for which he is responsible.

Any person seeking to enter the interior of any local correctional facility shall be subject to a search of his person and effects. Such search shall be performed in a manner reasonable under the circumstances and may be a condition precedent to entering a local correctional facility.

History.

1982, c. 636; 1995, c. 797; 2017, c. 759; 2022, c. 277.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 759, in subsection A, substituted “that” for “which” in the first sentence, “subsections A and B of §

53.1-68

” for “§

53.1-68

A and B” in the third sentence, and “subsections A and B of §

53.1-68

or a review conducted pursuant to §

53.1-69.1

” for “§

53.1-68

A and B” in the last sentence.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 277, substituted “The Governor, members of the General Assembly, and agents of the Board” for “Agents of the Board” in the second sentence of subsection A.

§ 53.1-127.1.
Establishment of stores in local correctional facilities.

Each sheriff who operates a correctional facility is authorized to provide for the establishment and operation of a store or commissary to deal in such articles and services as he deems proper. The net profits from the operation of such store that are generated from the inmates’ accounts shall be used within the facility for educational, recreational or other purposes for the benefit of the inmates as may be prescribed by the sheriff. Any other profits may be used for the general operation of the sheriff’s office. The sheriff shall be the purchasing agent in all matters involving the commissary and nonappropriated funds received from inmates. The funds from such operation of a store or commissary and from the inmate telephone services account shall be considered public funds.

History.

1993, cc. 314, 616; 2002, c. 182; 2013, c. 91.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 182 added the last sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 91 inserted “and services” near the end of the first sentence, inserted “that are generated from the inmates’ accounts” near the middle of the second sentence, and inserted the third sentence.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Inmates’ canteen fund may be used to make payments to faith based organizations

when such organizations provide rehabilitation services, education programs, counseling, and, if requested by an inmate, spiritual guidance, including providing Bibles and other religious materials. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Gabriel A. Morgan, Sheriff of the City of Newport News and The Honorable B.J. Roberts, Sheriff of the City of Hampton, 06-052 (12/14/06).

Inmate telephone commissions. —

Virginia law does not require that funds generated from inmate telephone commissions that are received by the treasurer and deposited into the city’s funds to be reallocated back to the sheriff’s office to be used within the facility for the benefit of the inmates. The sheriffs office may not establish and maintain a separate fund for such commissions. Regardless of the account into which the treasurer initially deposits the funds, they remain allocable to city.
See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Vanessa R. Crawford, Sheriff, City of Petersburg, 12-068, 2012 Va. AG LEXIS 39 (10/5/2012).